New Jersey, session 221, A2090.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. No later than two years after the effective date of this section, each solid waste management district in the State shall develop and implement a strategy for reducing, by the year 2030, the amount of food waste generated annually in the district by at least 50 percent of the amount which is generated in the year this section takes effect.  The strategy shall be adopted as an amendment to the district solid waste management plan required pursuant to the Solid Waste Management Act, P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-1 et seq.) and subject to the approval of the department. b.   No later than 180 days after the effective date of this section, the department shall develop, and publish on its Internet website, a list of measures solid waste management districts can take in order to achieve the food waste reduction requirement established in subsection a. of this section.  Such measures shall include, but need not be limited to, measures to increase the donation of surplus edible food, the source separation and recycling of food waste, the composting and anaerobic digestion of food waste and other food waste diversion methods that also reduce methane emissions, and public awareness campaigns. c.   As used in this section, food waste means food processing waste, food processing residue generated from processing and packaging operations, overripe or spoiled produce, trimmings from food, food product over-runs, soiled and unrecyclable paper, and used cooking fats, oil, and grease. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.